North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55A. North Carolina Nonprofit Corporation Act.
Part 3. Standards of Conduct.

§ 55A-8-30.
General standards for directors.

A director shall discharge his duties as a director, including his duties as a member of a committee:

In good faith;

With the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances; and

In a manner the director reasonably believes to be in the best interests of the corporation.

In discharging his duties, a director is entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, if prepared or presented by:

One or more officers or employees of the corporation whom the director reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented;

Legal counsel, public accountants, or other persons as to matters the director reasonably believes are within their professional or expert competence; or

A committee of the board of which he is not a member if the director reasonably believes the committee merits confidence.

A director is not entitled to the benefit of subsection (b) of this section if he has actual knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes reliance otherwise permitted by subsection (b) of this section unwarranted.

A director is not liable for any action taken as a director, or any failure to take any action, if he performed the duties of his office in compliance with this section.

A director’s personal liability for monetary damages for breach of a duty as a director may be limited or eliminated only to the extent provided in

G.S. 55A-8-60

or permitted in G.S. 55A- 2-02(b)(4), and a director may be entitled to indemnification against liability and expenses pursuant to Part 5 of Article 8 of this Chapter.

A director shall not be deemed to be a trustee with respect to the corporation or with respect to any property held or administered by the corporation, including without limit, property that may be subject to restrictions imposed by the donor or transferor of such property.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, s. 29; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

Although the word “fiduciary” is no longer used in describing the duty owed by a director, there is no intent to change North Carolina law in this area. See North Carolina Commentary to

G.S. 55-8-30

.

The Model Act counterpart of this section contains a provision in subsection (b) explicitly allowing reliance on ministers, priests and other religious authorities in the case of religious corporations. That provision was rejected as unnecessary because the subject is adequately covered by subdivision (b)(2).

Subsection (f) should not be inconsistent with the fiduciary duties prescribed by the Uniform Management of Institutional Funds Act in view of the Commentary to G.S. 36B-6, which states that the standard of care and prudence established by that section is generally comparable to that of a director of a business corporation rather than that of a private trustee; but in the event of any inconsistency, the provisions of the Uniform Act will control, as provided in G.S. 36B-8.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Duties of Nonprofit Corporate Directors - Emphasizing Oversight Responsibilities,” see 90 N.C. L. Rev. 1845 (2012).

§ 55A-8-31.
Director conflict of interest.

A conflict of interest transaction is a transaction with the corporation in which a director of the corporation has a direct or indirect interest. A conflict of interest transaction is not voidable by the corporation solely because of the director’s interest in the transaction if any one of the following is true:

The material facts of the transaction and the director’s interest were disclosed or known to the board of directors or a committee of the board and the board or committee authorized, approved, or ratified the transaction;

The material facts of the transaction and the director’s interest were disclosed or known to the members entitled to vote and they authorized, approved, or ratified the transaction; or

The transaction was fair to the corporation.

For purposes of this section, a director of the corporation has an indirect interest in a transaction if:

Another entity in which he has a material financial interest or in which he is a general partner is a party to the transaction; or

Another entity of which he is a director, officer, or trustee is a party to the transaction and the transaction is or should be considered by the board of directors of the corporation.

For purposes of subdivision (a)(1) of this section, a conflict of interest transaction is authorized, approved, or ratified if it receives the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors on the board of directors (or on the committee) who have no direct or indirect interest in the transaction, but a transaction shall not be authorized, approved, or ratified under this section by a single director. If a majority of the directors who have no direct or indirect interest in the transaction vote to authorize, approve, or ratify the transaction, a quorum is present for the purpose of taking action under this section. The presence of, or a vote cast by, a director with a direct or indirect interest in the transaction does not affect the validity of any action taken under subdivision (a)(1) of this section if the transaction is otherwise authorized, approved, or ratified as provided in that subdivision.

For purposes of subdivision (a)(2) of this section, a conflict of interest transaction is authorized, approved, or ratified by the members if it receives a majority of the votes entitled to be counted under this subsection. Votes cast by or voted under the control of a director who has a direct or indirect interest in the transaction, and votes cast by or voted under the control of an entity described in subdivision (b)(1) of this section, shall not be counted in a vote of members to determine whether to authorize, approve, or ratify a conflict of interest transaction under subdivision (a)(2) of this section. The vote of these members, however, is counted in determining whether the transaction is approved under other sections of this Chapter. A majority of the votes, whether or not present, that are entitled to be cast in a vote on the transaction under this subsection constitutes a quorum for the purpose of taking action under this section.

The articles of incorporation, bylaws, or a resolution of the board may impose additional requirements on conflict of interest transactions.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, s. 26; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

This section generally conforms to

G.S. 55-8-31

, except that subsection (e), which states an obvious proposition, was brought forward from the Model Act solely to avoid any contrary implication that might be created by its omission.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Duties of Nonprofit Corporate Directors - Emphasizing Oversight Responsibilities,” see 90 N.C. L. Rev. 1845 (2012).

§ 55A-8-32.
Loans to or guaranties for directors and officers.

No loan, guaranty, or other form of security shall be made or provided by a corporation to or for the benefit of its directors or officers, except that loans, guaranties, or other forms of security may be made to full-time employees of the corporation who are also directors or officers by action of its board of directors in accordance with G.S. 55A-8-31(a)(1).

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, s. 17; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

This section brings forward former G.S. 55A-18, with a conforming reference to the conflict of interest section.

§ 55A-8-33.
Liability for unlawful loans or distributions.

The liabilities imposed by this section are in addition to any other liabilities imposed by law upon directors of a corporation.

A director who votes for or assents to the making of a loan or guaranty or other form of security is personally liable to the corporation for the repayment or return of the money or value loaned, with interest thereon at the legal rate until paid, or for any liability of the corporation upon the guaranty, if it is established that he did not perform his duties in compliance with

G.S. 55A-8-30

or that the loan or guaranty was made in violation of

G.S. 55A-8-32

.

A director who votes for or assents to a distribution made in violation of Article 13 of this Chapter, Article 14 of this Chapter, or the articles of incorporation is personally liable to the corporation for the amount of the distribution that exceeds what could have been distributed without violating Article 13 of this Chapter, Article 14 of this Chapter, or the articles of incorporation if it is established that he did not perform his duties in compliance with

G.S. 55A-8-30

. In any proceeding commenced under this section, a director has all of the defenses ordinarily available to a director.

A director held liable under subsection (b) or (c) of this section is entitled to:

Contribution from every other director who could be held liable under subsection (b) or (c) of this section for the unlawful loan or distribution; and

Reimbursement from each person for the amount he accepted knowing the unlawful loan or distribution was made in violation of

G.S. 55A-8-32

, Article 13 of this Chapter, or Article 14 of this Chapter, or the articles of incorporation.

No action shall be brought against the directors for liability under this section after three years from the time when the cause of action was discovered or ought to have been discovered.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, s. 33; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

This section is an adaptation of former G.S. 55A-28.1, except that subsection (j) of that former section, which allowed creditors to enforce the statutory liabilities of the section in direct actions against directors, was not brought forward because a comparable provision in former G.S. 55-32(1) was not brought forward into the present Chapter 55. See the last paragraph of the North Carolina Commentary to

G.S. 55-14-08

.

§§ 55A-8-34 through 55A-8-39.

Reserved for future codification purposes.